Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.49
Original capitol furniture, defined.

As used in sections 81-1108.48 to 81-1108.53, unless the context otherwise requires, original capitol furniture shall mean all furniture, furnishings, and accessories including, but not limited to, desks, chairs, files, tables, couches, bookcases, credenzas, lights, lamps, clocks, trash receptacles, and hall trees.

Laws 1980, LB 885, § 2.